apertium-bho.bho.dix
    <pardef n="/इ__prn">       
 	     <e><p><l>इ</l><r>इ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>इ</l><r>इ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
 	     <e><p><l>ए</l><r>इ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>उनको</l><r>इ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l>उन<b/>लोगोंको</l><r>इ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>इ</l><r>इ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ऐइसे</l><r>इ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>इंकासे</l><r>इ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>एकरके</l><r>इ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>इन्काके</l><r>इ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
 	     <e><p><l>एकर</l><r>इ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
 	     <e><p><l>एकर</l><r>इ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
 	     <e><p><l>एकर</l><r>इ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
 	     <e><p><l>एकर</l><r>इ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>एकर</l><r>इ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>एकर</l><r>इ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>इ</l><r>इ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>इ<b/>लोग</l><r>इ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>एइमें</l><r>इ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>एइमें</l><r>इ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>	
      </pardef>
 	     
      <pardef n="/उ__prn">      
       <e><p><l>उ</l><r>उ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>उ<b/>लोग</l><r>उ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>उनकर</l><r>उ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ओकर</l><r>उ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>उकरासे</l><r>उ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>उकरासे</l><r>उ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>उकरा</l><r>उ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>उ<b/>लोग</l><r>उ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ओकर</l><r>उ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ओकर</l><r>उ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>उनकी</l><r>उ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>उनकरा</l><r>उ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>उ</l><r>उ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>उ<b/>लोग</l><r>उ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ओइमें</l><r>उ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ओइमें</l><r>उ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>	
     </pardef>

    <pardef n="/का__prn">       
      <e><p><l>का</l><r>का<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sg"/><s n="aa"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>का</l><r>का<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="pl"/><s n="aa"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>का</l><r>का<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sp"/><s n="aa"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>के</l><r>का<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nn"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>के</l><r>का<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nn"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>केकर</l><r>का<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>के</l><r>का<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>केकरासे</l><r>का<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>केसे</l><r>का<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>केकरा</l><r>का<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>कौनो</l><r>का<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>केकर</l><r>का<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>केकरा</l><r>का<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>केकर</l><r>का<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>केकर</l><r>का<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>केकर</l><r>का<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>केकर</l><r>का<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>के</l><r>का<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sg"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>किन्होंने</l><r>का<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="pl"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>के</l><r>का<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>कैमें</l><r>का<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>	
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="सब__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>से</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>के</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>की</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>का</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>को</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ने</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>में</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>से</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="इ"><i></i><par n="/इ__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="कीया"><i></i><par n="/का__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="सब"><i>सब</i><par n="सब__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ख़ुद"><i>ख़ुद</i><par n="सब__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="उ"><i></i><par n="/उ__prn"/></e>
